New York, session 2025-2026, S2550.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 4 of section 190.25 of the 2 criminal procedure law, as amended by chapter 677 of the laws of 1985, 3 is amended to read as follows: 4 (a) [Grand] (i) Except as otherwise provided by law, grand jury 5 proceedings are secret, and no grand juror, or other person specified in 6 subdivision three of this section or section 215.70 of the penal law, 7 may, except in the lawful discharge of [his] their duties or upon writ- 8 ten order of the court, disclose the nature or substance of any grand 9 jury testimony, evidence, or any decision, result or other matter 10 attending a grand jury proceeding. For the purpose of assisting the 11 grand jury in conducting its investigation, evidence obtained by a grand 12 jury may be independently examined by the district attorney, members of 13 [his] their staff, police officers specifically assigned to the investi- 14 gation, and such other persons as the court may specifically authorize. 15 Such evidence may not be disclosed to other persons without a court 16 order. Nothing contained herein shall prohibit a witness from disclos- 17 ing [his] their own testimony. 18 (ii) In proceedings where a grand jury is impaneled to hear and exam- 19 ine evidence concerning offenses, misconduct, nonfeasance and neglect 20 by a public officer or employee, whether criminal or otherwise, in 21 which a charge that a designated person committed a crime is dismissed 22 pursuant to subdivision one of section 190.75 of this article or 23 concluded without an indictment, any person may file a written petition EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02045-02-5 S. 2550 2 1 seeking the release of material concerning or related to such grand jury 2 proceeding, including but not limited to transcripts, reports, exhibits, 3 and material of any nature or substance of any grand jury testimony, 4 evidence or any decision, result or any other matter which occurred 5 during a grand jury proceeding upon the basis of enduring historical 6 importance. Enduring historical importance shall include grand jury 7 records forty years old or older and there shall be a rebuttable 8 presumption of the historical importance of such records pursuant to 9 this subparagraph. For the purposes of this subparagraph, "enduring 10 historical importance" shall mean a matter where the release of such 11 grand jury information would enhance the existing historical record, 12 foster further scholarly discussion, and improve the public's under- 13 standing of a significant historical event. In all such cases, upon a 14 finding of enduring historical importance, a court shall release such 15 grand jury records in a manner and form as determined by the court. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to such 17 records created before, on or after such date.